sk-SK: Typ konštrukcie kajaku: Súprava; Playboat; Závodný kajak; Rekreačný kajak; Morský kajak; Surfový kajak; Surfski; Turistický kajak; Kajak na divokú vodu; Iné
el: Τύπος σχεδιασμού καγιάκ: Κιτ; Playboat; Αγωνιστικό καγιάκ; Καγιάκ αναψυχής; Καγιάκ θαλάσσης; Καγιάκ σερφ; Surfski; Καγιάκ περιήγησης; Καγιάκ για ορμητικά νερά; Άλλο
hu: Kajak kialakítása: Építőkészlet; Playboat; Versenykajak; Szabadidős kajak; Tengeri kajak; Szörfkajak; Surfski; Túrakajak; Vadvízi kajak; Egyéb
da: Type af kajakdesign: Sæt; Playboat; Kapkajak; Fritidskajak; Havkajak; Surfkajak; Surfski; Turkajak; Foskajak; Andet
nb: Kajakkens designtype: Sett; Playboat; Racingkajakk; Fritidskajakk; Havkajakk; Surfkajakk; Surfski; Turkajakk; Elvekajakk; Annet
zh-CN: 皮划艇设计类型: 套件; 花式艇; 竞速皮划艇; 休闲皮划艇; 海洋皮划艇; 冲浪皮划艇; 海上皮划艇/冲浪皮艇; 旅行皮划艇; 白水皮划艇; 其他
bg-BG: Тип дизайн на каяк: Комплект; Плейбоут; Състезателен каяк; Каяк за отдих; Морски каяк; Сърф каяк; Сърфски; Туристически каяк; Каяк за бързи води; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul de design al caiacului: Kit; Playboat; Caiac de curse; Caiac de agrement; Caiac de mare; Caiac de surf; Surfski; Caiac de tură; Caiac de whitewater; Altele
it: Tipo di design del kayak: Kit; Da freestyle (playboat); Kayak da gara; Kayak da diporto; Kayak da mare; Surf kayak; Surfski; Kayak da turismo; Kayak da acque bianche; Altro
nl: Kajak ontwerp type: Kit; Speelboot; Racekajak; Recreatiekajak; Zeekajak; Surfkajak; Surfski; Tourkajak; Wildwaterkajak; Overig
en: Kayak design type: Kit; Playboat; Racing kayak; Recreational kayak; Sea kayak; Surf kayak; Surfski; Touring kayak; Whitewater kayak; Other
es: Tipo de diseño de kayak: Kit; Playboat; Kayak de carreras; Kayak recreativo; Kayak de mar; Kayak de surf; Surfski; Kayak de travesía; Kayak de aguas bravas; Otro
pl: Typ konstrukcji kajaka: Zestaw do samodzielnego montażu; Playboat; Kajak wyścigowy; Kajak rekreacyjny; Kajak morski; Kajak surfingowy; Surfski; Kajak turystyczny; Kajak górski; Inny
sv: Kajakdesigntyp: Kit; Playboat; Tävlingskajak; Fritidskajak; Havskajak; Surfkajak; Surfski; Turkajak; Forskajak; Annat
lt-LT: Baidarės dizaino tipas: Rinkinys; Laisvojo stiliaus baidarė; Lenktyninė baidarė; Pramoginė baidarė; Jūrinė baidarė; Banglenčių baidarė; Surfski; Turistinė baidarė; Sraunių upių baidarė; Kita
pt-BR: Caiaque tipo de design: Kit; Playboat; Caiaque de corrida; Caiaque recreativo; Caiaque de mar; Caiaque de surf; Surfski; Caiaque de turismo; Caiaque de corredeiras; Outro
cs: Typ konstrukce kajaku: Sada; Playboat (freestyle); Závodní kajak; Rekreační kajak; Mořský kajak; Surfový kajak; Surfski; Turistický kajak; Kajak na divokou vodu; Jiné
ru: Тип конструкции каяка: Сборный; Плейбоат; Гоночный каяк; Прогулочный каяк; Морской каяк; Серф-каяк; Серф-ски; Туристический каяк; Каяк для бурной воды; Другое
fr: Type de kayak: Kit; Playboat; Kayak de course; Kayak de loisir; Kayak de mer; Kayak de surf; Surfski; Kayak de randonnée; Kayak d’eau vive; Autre
fi: Kajakin muotoilun tyyppi: Sarja; Playboat; Kilpakajakki; Harrastekajakki; Merikajakki; Surffikajakki; Surfski; Retkikajakki; Koskikajakki; Muu
ko: 카약 디자인 유형: 키트; 플레이보트; 레이싱 카약; 레저용 카약; 바다 카약; 서프 카약; 서프스키; 투어링 카약; 급류 카약; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de design do caiaque: Kit; Playboat; Caiaque de competição; Caiaque de recreio; Caiaque de mar; Caiaque de surf; Surfski; Caiaque de travessia; Caiaque de águas bravas; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta zasnove kajaka: Komplet; Playboat (akrobatski kajak); Tekmovalni kajak; Rekreativni kajak; Morski kajak; Kajak za surfanje; Kajak surfski; Potovalni kajak; Kajak za divje vode; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta dizajna kajaka: Komplet; Freestyle kajak; Natjecateljski kajak; Rekreativni kajak; Kajak za more; Kajak za surfanje; Surfski; Turni kajak; Kajak za divlje vode; Ostalo
tr: Kayak tasarım türü: Kit; Playboat; Yarış kanosu; Hobi kanosu; Deniz kanosu; Sörf kanosu; Surfski; Tur kanosu; Akarsu kanosu; Diğer
de: Typ des Kajakdesigns: Bausatz; Playboat; Rennkajak; Freizeitkajak; Seekajak; Surfkajak; Surfski; Tourenkajak; Wildwasserkajak; Sonstige
th: ประเภทการออกแบบเรือคายัค: ชุดประกอบ; เพลย์โบ๊ต; คายัคสำหรับแข่ง; คายัคสันทนาการ; คายัคทะเล; เซิร์ฟคายัค; เซิร์ฟสกี; คายัคทัวร์ริง; คายัคล่องแก่ง; อื่นๆ
ja: カヤックのデザインタイプ: キット; プレイボート; レーシングカヤック; レクリエーショナルカヤック; シーカヤック; サーフカヤック; サーフスキー; ツーリングカヤック; ホワイトウォーターカヤック; その他
vi: Loại thiết kế thuyền kayak: Bộ; Kayak biểu diễn (Playboat); Kayak đua; Kayak giải trí; Kayak biển; Kayak lướt sóng; Surfski; Kayak du lịch; Kayak vượt thác; Khác
zh-TW: 獨木舟設計類型: 套件; 花式皮划艇; 競速皮划艇; 休閒皮划艇; 海洋皮划艇; 衝浪皮划艇; 衝浪滑雪艇; 巡迴皮划艇; 激流皮划艇; 其他